Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 1 General Provisions

46-5-20.
Judicial proceedings for disconnection and removal of illegally used telephone facilities; liability of telephone companies for complying with order of disconnection and removal.

When any municipal, county, state, or federal law enforcement officer acting within his apparent jurisdiction has reason to believe that certain telephone facilities or any part thereof are being used or have been used in violation of any federal law, the laws of the State of Georgia, or the ordinances of any municipality therein, that officer may make oath or affidavit stating his belief to the district attorney of the judicial circuit in which the telephone facilities are located. Thereupon, the district attorney shall petition the judge of the superior court of that circuit to issue a rule nisi which shall be promptly served upon the person in whose name the telephone facilities are listed, requiring the party, within a reasonable time to be fixed by the judge, which shall not be less than 48 hours from time of service of the petition on said party, to show cause before the judge why the telephone facilities should not be promptly removed. At the hearing on the rule nisi the burden of proof shall be upon the petitioner.

Upon a finding by the court that the telephone facilities are being or have been used in violation of the laws described in subsection (a) of this Code section, the court shall issue an order requiring the telephone company which is rendering service over the facilities to disconnect and remove such facilities. Upon receipt of such order, which shall be served upon an officer of the telephone company by the sheriff of the county in which the telephone facilities are installed or by his duly authorized deputies, the telephone company shall proceed within a reasonable time to disconnect and remove such facilities and discontinue all telephone service rendered over the facilities until further order of the court.

The law enforcement officer who applies to the district attorney for the removal of such facilities shall, in his official capacity, be a necessary party to any proceeding or action arising out of or under this Code section.

No telephone company shall be liable for any damages, penalty, or forfeiture, whether civil or criminal, for any act performed in compliance with any order issued by the judge of the superior court under this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 149, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46.

Law reviews.

For note discussing organized crime in Georgia with respect to the application of state gambling laws, and suggesting proposals for combatting organized crime, see 7 Ga. St. B.J. 124 (1970).

46-5-21.
Using telephone communications for obscene, threatening, or harassing purposes.

It shall be a misdemeanor for any person, by means of telephone communication in this state, to:

Make any comment, request, suggestion, or proposal which is obscene, lewd, lascivious, filthy, or indecent;

Make a telephone call, whether or not conversation ensues, without disclosing his identity and with intent to annoy, abuse, threaten, or harass any person at the called number;

Make or cause the telephone of another repeatedly or continuously to ring, with intent to harass any person at the called number; or

Make repeated telephone calls, during which conversation ensues, solely to harass any person at the called number.

Any person who knowingly permits any telephone under his control to be used for any purpose prohibited by this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 9, § 1.

Cross references.

Further provisions regarding unlawful communications by telephone, §

16-11-39.1

.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of criminal law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 113 (2005).

46-5-22.
Using telephone communications for obscene comments, requests, or suggestions; injunction; recorded commercial message.

It shall be unlawful for any person, by means of a telephone communication for commercial purposes, to make directly or by means of an electronic recording device, any comment, request, suggestion, or proposal which is obscene, lewd, lascivious, filthy, or indecent. Any person who makes any such comment, request, suggestion, or proposal may be subject to prosecution under this Code section regardless of whether such person placed or initiated the telephone call.

It shall be unlawful for any person to permit knowingly any telephone or telephone facility connected to a local exchange telephone under such person’s control to be used for any purpose prohibited by this Code section.

Any person who violates any provision of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. For purposes of this subsection, each day of a violation shall constitute a separate offense.

A court may grant a preliminary injunction under this Code section after due notice to the party to be enjoined and upon a sufficient showing of the likelihood of ultimate success in a prosecution under this Code section and showing that such injunction would be in the public interest. Such injunction shall be dissolved by the court if a full trial on the merits is not scheduled within such period as may be specified by the court not to exceed 30 days.

In the event that a person applies to a local exchange telephone company for use of the local exchange telephone company’s facilities for the purpose of transmitting a recorded commercial message, the local exchange telephone company shall have the authority to review the message and deny the applicant’s request for facilities if the message appears to violate the provisions of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1310, § 1.

Cross references.

Penalty for false statements by telephone solicitors, §

16-9-54

.

Further provisions regarding unlawful communications by telephone, §

16-11-39.1

.

Obscene communications generally, §

16-12-80

et seq.

46-5-23.
Use of automatic dialing and recorded message (ADAD) equipment.

As used in this Code section, the term “ADAD equipment” means any device or system of devices which is used, whether alone or in conjunction with other equipment, for the purpose of automatically selecting or dialing telephone numbers and disseminating prerecorded messages to the numbers so selected or dialed.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use, to employ or direct another person to use, or to contract for the use of ADAD equipment for the purpose of advertising or offering for sale, lease, rental, or as a gift any goods, services, or property, either real or personal, primarily for personal, family, or household use or for the purpose of conducting polls or soliciting information where:

Consent is not received prior to the initiation of the calls as specified in paragraph (3) of this subsection;

Such use is other than between the hours of 8:00 A.M. and 9:00 P.M.;

The ADAD equipment will operate unattended or is not so designed and equipped with an automatic clock and calendar device that it will not operate unattended, even in the event of power failures;

Such use involves either the random or sequential dialing of telephone numbers;

The telephone number required to be stated in subparagraph (G) of this paragraph is not one which during normal business hours is promptly answered in person by a person who is an agent of the person on whose behalf the automatic calls are made and who is willing and able to provide information concerning the automatic calls;

The automatic dialing and recorded message player does not automatically and immediately terminate its connection with any telephone call within ten seconds after the person called fails to give consent for the playing of a recorded message or hangs up his or her telephone;

The recorded message fails to state clearly the name and telephone number of the person or organization initiating the call within the first 25 seconds of the call and at the conclusion of the call; or

Such use involves calls to telephone numbers which at the request of the customer have been omitted from the telephone directory published by the local exchange company serving the customer or involves calls to hospitals, nursing homes, fire protection agencies, or law enforcement agencies;

A person may give consent to a call made with ADAD equipment when a line operator introduces the call and states an intent to play a recorded message. Any such consent shall apply only to one particular call and shall not constitute prior consent to receive further calls through the use of such ADAD equipment.

Any person wishing to receive telephone calls through the use of ADAD equipment shall give his or her written consent to the person using, employing or directing another person to use, or contracting for the use of such ADAD equipment. Any forms used for such written consent by any person using, employing or directing another person to use, or contracting for the use of such ADAD equipment shall clearly and conspicuously state its purpose and effect and clearly and conspicuously give notice of how the consent may be withdrawn. A record of such written consent shall be maintained by the person to whom consent is given and shall be made available to the commission or its authorized representative, without further action, during normal business hours and following reasonable notice. Such consent shall, unless withdrawn, be valid for a period of two years from the date on which it is executed; and such record of written consent shall be maintained by the person to whom consent is given for at least the same period of time. Any consent to receive telephone calls through the use of ADAD equipment shall be void and withdrawn on the fifteenth day following the receipt of a letter withdrawing such consent. It shall be unlawful for any person to whom written consent is given to fail to maintain the record of such written consent for the time period required by this paragraph or to prevent or hinder the commission or its authorized representative from inspecting any such record of written consent.

It shall not be unlawful for any person to use, to employ or direct another person to use, or to contract for the use of ADAD equipment in any manner covered by the provisions of subparagraphs (a)(2)(B) through (a)(2)(G) of this Code section when:

Calls are made with ADAD equipment by a nonprofit organization, or by an individual using such calls other than for commercial profit-making purposes, and the calls do not involve the advertisement or offering for sale, lease, or rental of goods, services, or property;

Calls made with ADAD equipment relate to payment for, service of, or warranty coverage of previously ordered or purchased goods or services; or

Calls made with ADAD equipment relate to collection of lawful debts.

It shall be unlawful for any person to connect any ADAD equipment to any telephone line in this state for the purpose of making telephone calls to persons in this state through the use of ADAD equipment unless a permit has been issued for such ADAD equipment by the commission. Any person desiring to use ADAD equipment in this state shall make application for a permit to the commission on forms prescribed by the commission and shall pay a fee as prescribed by the commission for such permit. Permits shall be renewed biennially as prescribed by the commission and upon payment of a renewal fee. The fees charged shall cover the administrative cost for the issuance of such permits. Permits shall be subject to suspension or revocation for any violation of this Code section.

The provisions of this Code section shall supersede any prior rule, regulation, or order of the commission governing the use of ADAD equipment but shall not prohibit or supersede any future rule, regulation, or order of the commission governing the use of ADAD equipment except to the extent that any such rule, regulation, or order directly conflicts with this subsection. Except for criminal sanctions, the commission is charged with the responsibility of enforcing this Code section; and the commission shall require local exchange companies to file with the commission appropriate tariff revisions to implement this subsection. Any person who operates or utilizes ADAD equipment in violation of the provisions of this Code section shall be subject to disconnection of telephone service if the violation does not cease within ten days from the date of notification to such person by the local exchange company; and the tariff revisions filed by local exchange companies shall provide for the giving of such notification by local exchange companies and for such disconnection of service.

Any person who violates any provision of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1159, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 46.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code section 28-9-5, in 1987, a semicolon was substituted for a period at the end of subparagraph (a)(2)(E).

Law reviews.

For annual survey of commercial law, see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 119 (1991).

46-5-24.
Use of certain telephone numbers by ADAD equipment prohibited.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“ADAD equipment” means any device or system of devices which is used, whether alone or in conjunction with other equipment, for the purpose of automatically selecting or dialing telephone numbers and disseminating prerecorded messages to the numbers so selected or dialed.

“976 number” means any seven-digit telephone number the first three digits of which are 976 or any other combination of numbers and for which a per-call fee is charged for calling such telephone number.

It shall be unlawful for any person making use of a 976 number for the receipt of incoming calls to use, to employ or direct another person to use, or to contract for the use of ADAD equipment for the purpose of soliciting any person to call such 976 number.

It shall be unlawful for any person making use of a 976 number for the receipt of incoming calls to use, to employ or direct another person to use, or to contract for the use of the United States mail for the purpose of soliciting any person to call such 976 number.

No telephone exchange company shall provide access to a 976 number or numbers to any person who solicits calls to such number or numbers through the use of ADAD equipment or through the use of the United States mail. The telephone exchange companies shall, upon the order of the commission, withdraw access to a 976 number or numbers from any person if calls to such number or numbers are solicited by ADAD equipment or are solicited through the use of the United States mail.

The provisions of this Code section shall supersede any rule, regulation, or order governing the use of 976 numbers if such is in conflict with this Code section. Except for criminal sanctions, the commission is charged with the responsibility of enforcing this Code section. Any person who violates any provision of this Code section shall be subject to disconnection of 976 number telephone service if the commission determines that any violation has occurred and upon the commission’s, thereafter, issuing an order directing such disconnection.

Any person who violates any provision of subsection (b) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1246, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code section 28-9-5, in 1988, “numbers” was substituted for “number” in paragraph (a)(1).

46-5-25.
Transmission of unsolicited commercial facsimile messages.

As used in this Code section, the term “telefacsimile” shall refer to any process by which electronic signals are transmitted by any telephone system for conversion into written text.

It shall be unlawful for any person to initiate the transmission of, employ or direct another person to initiate the transmission of, or contract for the initiation of the transmission of an unsolicited facsimile message for the commercial purpose of advertising or offering the sale, lease, rental, or gift of any goods, services, or real or personal property.

Subsection (b) of this Code section shall not apply where the recipient has consented to the receipt of one or more telefacsimile messages or where there exists a prior contractual or business relationship between the recipient and the initiator or the initiator’s principal.

The exception provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not apply where the recipient has notified the initiator or the initiator’s principal that the recipient does not wish to receive further telefacsimile messages from the initiator or the initiator’s principal.

Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $1,000.00. Each transmission of a facsimile message in violation of this Code section shall constitute a separate offense.

The commission is charged with the responsibility of civil enforcement of this Code section and the commission shall require local exchange companies to file with the commission appropriate tariff revisions to implement this subsection. Any person who violates the provisions of this Code section shall be subject to disconnection of telephone service if the violation does not cease within ten days from the date of notification to such person by the local exchange company; and the tariff revisions filed by local exchange companies shall provide for the giving of such notification by local exchange companies and for such disconnection of service.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 252, § 1.

Law reviews.

For note on 1990 enactment of this Code section, see 7 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 360 (1990).

46-5-26.
Access to live telephone operator.

Each telecommunications utility and telecommunications company that provides operator service shall ensure that a caller may obtain access to a live operator through a method designed to be easily and clearly understandable and accessible to the caller. This Code section applies regardless of the method by which the telecommunications utility or telecommunications company provides the operator service. The requirements of this Code section shall not apply to telephones located in prisons or jail facilities or to wireless telecommunication services. For the purpose of this Code section, “operator services” means services that are provided when a caller dials “0”.

The failure of a telecommunications utility or telecommunications company to provide access to a live operator as required in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not serve as the basis for a cause of action for personal injuries or damage to property.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-26

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 520, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 847, § 8/HB 1115.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, deleted the former second sentence of subsection (a), which read: “A telecommunications utility or telecommunications company shall submit to the Public Service Commission the method by which the telecommunications utility or telecommunications company shall provide access to a live operator for review, except for a telecommunications utility or telecommunications company whose operator services are under the jurisdiction, regulation, and rules of the Public Service Commission.”

46-5-27.
Telephone solicitations to residential, mobile, or wireless subscribers;
Public Service Commission to establish and maintain list of certain subscribers; authorization for imposition of administrative fees; confidential nature of data base; required identification.

The General Assembly finds that:

The use of the telephone to market goods and services is pervasive now due to the increased use of cost-effective telemarketing techniques;

Over 30,000 businesses actively telemarket goods and services to business and residential customers;

Every day, over 300,000 solicitors place calls to more than 18 million Americans, including citizens of this state;

Telemarketing, however, can be an intrusive and relentless invasion of the privacy and peacefulness of individuals;

Many citizens of this state are outraged over the proliferation of nuisance calls from telemarketers;

Individuals’ privacy rights and commercial freedom of speech can be balanced in a way that accommodates both the privacy of individuals and legitimate telemarketing practices; and

It is in the public interest to establish a mechanism under which the individual citizens of this state can decide whether or not to receive telemarketing calls.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Caller identification service” means a type of telephone service which permits telephone subscribers to see the telephone number of incoming telephone calls.

“Residential, mobile, or wireless subscriber” means a person who has subscribed to telephone service from a local exchange company or mobile or wireless telephone service provider or other persons living or residing with such person.

“Telephone solicitation” means any voice communication over a telephone line for the purpose of encouraging the purchase or rental of, or investment in, property, goods, or services, but does not include communications:

To any residential, mobile, or wireless subscriber with that subscriber’s prior express invitation or permission;

By or on behalf of any person or entity with whom a residential, mobile, or wireless subscriber has a prior or current business or personal relationship; or

By or on behalf of a charitable organization which has filed a registration statement pursuant to Code Section 43-17-5, is exempt from such registration under paragraphs (1) through (6) of subsection (a) of Code Section 43-17-9, or is exempt from such registration as a religious organization or agency referred to in paragraph (2) of Code Section 43-17-2.

Such communication may be from a live operator, through the use of ADAD equipment as defined in Code Section 46-5-23, or by other means.

No person or entity shall make or cause to be made any telephone solicitation to the telephone line of any residential, mobile, or wireless subscriber in this state who has given notice to the commission, in accordance with regulations promulgated under subsection (d) of this Code section, of such subscriber’s objection to receiving telephone solicitations.

The commission shall establish and provide for the operation of a data base to compile a list of telephone numbers of residential, mobile, and wireless subscribers who object to receiving telephone solicitations. It shall be the duty of the commission to have such data base in operation no later than January 1, 1999.

Such data base may be operated by the commission or by another entity selected by and awarded a contract by the commission.

No later than January 1, 1999, the commission shall promulgate regulations which:

Require each local exchange company to inform its residential, mobile, or wireless subscribers of the opportunity to provide notification to the commission or its contractor that such subscriber objects to receiving telephone solicitations;

Specify the methods by which each residential, mobile, or wireless subscriber may give notice to the commission or its contractor of his or her objection to receiving such solicitations and methods for revocation of such notice;

Specify the length of time for which a notice of objection shall be effective and the effect of a change of telephone number on such notice;

Specify the methods by which such objections and revocations shall be collected and added to the data base;

Specify the methods by which any person or entity desiring to make telephone solicitations will obtain access to the data base as required to avoid calling the telephone numbers of residential, mobile, or wireless subscribers included in the data base; and

Specify such other matters relating to the data base that the commission deems desirable.

If, pursuant to 47 U.S.C. Section 227(c)(3), the Federal Communications Commission establishes a single national data base of telephone numbers of subscribers who object to receiving telephone solicitations, the commission shall include the part of such single national data base that relates to Georgia in the data base established under this Code section.

The commission may provide by rule or regulation for administrative fees to be imposed upon:

A residential, mobile, or wireless subscriber for each notice of inclusion in the data base established under this Code section; provided, however, that the commission shall not set this fee in an amount greater than $5.00; and

A person or entity desiring to make telephone solicitations for access to or for electronic copies of the data base established under this Code section.

Information contained in the data base established under this Code section shall be used only for the purpose of compliance with this Code section or in a proceeding or action under subsection (h) or (i) of this Code section. Such information shall not be subject to public inspection or disclosure under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.

No person shall knowingly compile or disseminate or compile and disseminate information obtained from the data base for any reason other than those legitimate purposes established by law. Any person found guilty of violating this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $1,000.00. Each instance of an unauthorized disclosure of information from the data base shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person or entity who makes a telephone solicitation to the telephone line of any residential, mobile, or wireless subscriber in this state shall, at the beginning of such call, state clearly the identity of the person or entity initiating the call.

No person or entity who makes a telephone solicitation to the telephone line of a residential, mobile, or wireless subscriber in this state shall knowingly utilize any method to block or otherwise circumvent such subscriber’s use of a caller identification service.

The Attorney General shall have authority to initiate proceedings, pursuant to Code Section 10-1-397, relating to a knowing violation or threatened knowing violation of subsection (c) or (g) of this Code section. Such proceedings include without limitation proceedings to issue a cease and desist order, to issue an order imposing a civil penalty up to a maximum of $2,000.00 for each knowing violation, and to seek additional relief in any superior court of competent jurisdiction. Such actions shall be brought in the name of the state. The provisions of Code Sections 10-1-398, 10-1-398.1, and 10-1-405 shall apply to proceedings initiated by the Attorney General under this subsection. The Attorney General is authorized to issue investigative demands, issue subpoenas, administer oaths, and conduct hearings in the course of investigating a violation of subsection (c) or (g) of this Code section, in accordance with the provisions of Code Sections 10-1-403 and 10-1-404.

Any person who has received more than one telephone solicitation within any 12 month period by or on behalf of the same person or entity in violation of subsection (c) or (g) of this Code section may either bring an action to enjoin such violation; bring an action to recover for actual monetary loss from such knowing violation or to receive up to $2,000.00 in damages for each such knowing violation, whichever is greater; or bring both such actions.

It shall be a defense in any action or proceeding brought under subsection (h) or (i) of this Code section that the defendant has established and implemented, with due care, reasonable practices and procedures to effectively prevent telephone solicitations in violation of this Code section.

No action or proceeding may be brought under subsection (h) or (i) of this Code section:

More than two years after the person bringing the action knew or should have known of the occurrence of the alleged violation; or

More than two years after the termination of any proceeding or action by the State of Georgia, whichever is later.

A court of this state may exercise personal jurisdiction over any nonresident or his or her executor or administrator as to an action or proceeding authorized by this Code section in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 9-10-91.

The remedies, duties, prohibitions, and penalties of this Code section are not exclusive and are in addition to all other causes of action, remedies, and penalties provided by law.

No provider of telephone caller identification service shall be held liable for violations of this Code section committed by other persons or entities.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-27

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 505, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 562, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 46; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1088, § 44/SB 148.

The 2003 amendment,

effective July 1, 2003, inserted “, mobile, or wireless” throughout subsections (a) through (g); in subsection (a), deleted “to the home” following “services” in paragraph (a)(1), substituted “individuals” for “the home” in paragraph (a)(4), deleted “to their homes” following “calls” in paragraph (a)(5), and deleted “in their homes” following “calls” at the end of paragraph (a)(7); in paragraph (b)(2), deleted “residential” preceding “telephone service” and substituted “or mobile or wireless telephone service provider, or other” for “or the other”; in subsection (d), inserted “, mobile, and wireless” in the first sentence of paragraph (d)(1), substituted “selected by and awarded a contract by” for “under contract with” in paragraph (d)(2), substituted “and methods for revocation” for “or revocation” in subparagraph (d)(3)(B); rewrote subsection (e); and, in subsection (f), designated the existing provisions as paragraph (f)(1) and added paragraph (f)(2).

The 2004 amendment,

effective May 13, 2004, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in paragraph (b)(2).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subsection (h), substituted “Attorney General” for “administrator appointed pursuant to subsection (g) of Code Section 10-1-395” at the beginning of the first sentence and substituted “Attorney General” for “administrator” in the fourth and fifth sentences.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 505, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 1998, for purposes of administrative establishment of the data base, including receipt of notices, by the Public Service Commission and shall become effective for all purposes on January 1, 1999.”

Law reviews.

For review of 1998 legislation relating to public utilities and transportation, see 15 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 209 (1998).

For note on the 2003 amendment of this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 228 (2003).

46-5-28.
Consent required for inclusion of subscribers’ names or dialing numbers in a wireless telephone data base or a traditional telephone directory; exceptions; disclosure of wireless numbers to telemarketers prohibited; violations; immunity of service suppliers for authorized disclosures.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Service supplier” means a person or entity who provides wireless service to a telephone subscriber.

“Traditional telephone directory” means a telephone directory, in any format, containing a majority of the landline telephone numbers for the given geographic coverage area for that directory.

“Wireless service” means “commercial mobile service” as defined under Section 332(D) of the Federal Telecommunications Act of 1996 (47 U.S.C. Section 157, et seq.), regulations of the Federal Communications Commission, and the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-66) and includes real-time, two-way interconnected voice service which is provided over networks which utilize intelligent switching capability and offer seamless handoff to customers. The term does not include one-way signaling service, data transmission service, nonlocal radio access line service, or a private telecommunications service.

“Wireless telephone data base” means any collection of telephone numbers that identifies the names and telephone numbers of multiple subscribers of one or more service suppliers.

A service supplier or any direct or indirect affiliate or agent of a service supplier providing the name and dialing number of a subscriber for inclusion in any wireless telephone data base which is or will be made publicly available shall not include the dialing number of any wireless service subscriber without first obtaining the express consent of that subscriber. The subscriber’s consent shall meet all of the following requirements:

It shall be recorded in oral, electronic, or written form;

It shall be:

A separate document that is not attached to any other document or if it is within another document shall be in a separate section of the document that includes the disclosure;

A separate screen or if it is within another screen shall be in a separate section of the screen that includes the disclosure; or

A sound recording of a discrete verbal confirmation;

It shall be unambiguous and conspicuously disclose that the subscriber is consenting to have the subscriber’s dialing number sold or licensed as part of a publicly accessible wireless telephone data base; and

The service supplier must disclose in an unambiguous and conspicuous manner to the wireless customer that upon consent: (A) the customer is agreeing to have his or her wireless number accessed by anyone who utilizes the wireless telephone data base; and (B) if the customer has a rate plan that charges the customer for usage, that calls received as a result, unsolicited or otherwise, will be applied against the subscriber’s planned minutes.

A subscriber who provides express consent pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section may revoke that consent at any time. A service supplier shall comply with the subscriber’s request to opt out within a reasonable period of time, not to exceed 60 days.

A subscriber shall not be charged for making the choice to not be listed in a publicly accessible wireless telephone data base.

This Code section does not apply to the provision of telephone numbers to the following parties for the purposes indicated; provided, however, that such parties shall use such telephone numbers solely for the purposes indicated and shall not transfer such telephone numbers to any third party:

Any law enforcement agency, fire protection agency, public health agency, public environmental health agency, city or county emergency services planning agency, or private for-profit agency operating under contract with, and at the direction of, one or more of these agencies, for the exclusive purpose of responding to a 9-1-1 call or communicating an imminent threat to life or property. This information or these records shall not be open to examination for any purpose not directly connected with the administration of the services specified in this paragraph;

A lawful process issued under state or federal law;

A service supplier providing service between service areas for the provision to the subscriber of telephone service between service areas, or third parties for the limited purpose of providing collection and billing services for the service supplier;

A service supplier to effectuate a subscriber’s request to transfer the subscriber’s assigned telephone number from the subscriber’s existing service supplier to a new service supplier;

The commission; or

A traditional telephone directory publisher, for the purposes of publishing a directory in any format, so long as the information was published before July 1, 2005.

Subsequent to July 1, 2005, a traditional telephone directory publisher must obtain the wireless subscriber’s recorded oral, electronic, or written consent for the wireless subscriber’s name and wireless dialing number to be published in a traditional telephone directory.

No service supplier shall sell or otherwise provide a list of wireless numbers to any telemarketer except that such numbers may be provided to a telemarketer affiliated with the service supplier for the sole purpose of facilitating communication by or on behalf of the service supplier as permitted under subparagraph (b)(3)(B) of Code Section 46-5-27.

Every deliberate violation of this Code section is grounds for a civil suit by the aggrieved subscriber against the service supplier responsible for the violation.

No service supplier shall be subject to criminal or civil liability for the release of customer information as authorized by this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-28

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1191, § 1/SB 46; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 46/SB 465.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2005.

The 2006 amendment,

effective April 14, 2006, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “data base” for “database” throughout this Code section; substituted “a 9-1-1 call” for “a 911 call” in the first sentence of paragraph (e)(1), and substituted “July 1, 2005” for “the effective date of this Code section” in paragraph (e)(6) and subsection (f).